Maine, session 132, LD1963.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §1316, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A,
§124, is amended to read:
§1316. Testimony presented by employees of public utilities, competitive electricity
providers, affiliated interests or utility contractors to legislative committees,
the Public Utilities Commission and the Public Advocate Maine Public Utility
Whistleblower Protection Act
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Employee" means a person who currently performs or formerly performed a
service for wages or other remuneration under a contract of hire, expressed or implied,
Page 1 - 132LR2099(01)

412 for a public utility, competitive electricity provider, affiliated interest or utility
423 contractor.
A-1. "Affiliated interest" has the same meaning as in section 707, subsection 1,
paragraph A.
B. "Employer" means a public utility, competitive electricity provider, affiliated
interest or utility contractor licensed to do business in this State with one or more
employees.
C. "Legislative committee" means a joint standing committee or a joint select
committee of the Legislature, a task force, commission or council or any other
committee established by the Legislature and composed wholly or partly of Legislators
for the purpose of conducting legislative business.
D. "Own time" means an employee's vacation or personal time, earned as a condition
of employment.
E. "Utility contractor" means a person that provides goods or services to a public utility
or competitive electricity provider.
F. "Whistleblower" means an employee or utility contractor who testifies or provides
information regarding potentially imprudent or illegal activity by an employer that may
cause higher rates, reduced service quality, reduced competition, increased pollution,
harm to an employee or other harm to the public interest.
1-A. Short title. This section may be known and cited as "the Maine Public Utility
Whistleblower Protection Act."
2. Right of employees to provide testimony. Employees have the right to represent
themselves and to testify before or provide information to a legislative committee, the
commission or the Public Advocate on their own time. An employee who complies with
this section may not be denied the right to testify before or provide information to a
legislative committee, the commission or the Public Advocate.
2-A. Right of utility contractors to provide testimony. A utility contractor has the
right to testify before or provide information to a legislative committee, the commission or
the Public Advocate.
3. Discharge of, threats to or discrimination against employees for testimony
presented to legislative committees, the commission or the Public Advocate. A
supervisor may not discharge, threaten or otherwise discriminate against an employee
regarding the employee's compensation, terms, conditions, location or privileges of
employment because the employee, in compliance with this section, in good faith testifies
before or provides information to a legislative committee, the commission or the Public
Advocate regarding the operation of the business of a public utility or competitive
electricity provider or because the employee brings the subject matter of the testimony or
information to the attention of a person having supervisory authority.
This subsection does not apply to an employee who has testified before or provided
information to a legislative committee, the commission or the Public Advocate unless the
employee has first brought the subject matter of the testimony or information in writing to
the attention of a person having supervisory authority with the employer and has allowed
Page 2 - 132LR2099(01)

413 the employer a reasonable time to address the subject matter of the testimony or
424 information. If appropriate, the employer shall respond in writing.
4. Exceptions. The protections created in subsections 3 and 9 do not apply to
testimony or information that, upon reasonable inquiry by the employee or utility
contractor, would be found to be false found by the commission or a court of law to have
been intentionally or knowingly false.
5. Civil actions for injunctive relief or other remedies by employees. An employee
who alleges a violation of rights under this section and who has made reasonable efforts to
exhaust all grievance procedures, as provided for in the contract of employment or that
otherwise may be available at the employee's place of employment, may bring a civil
action, including an action for injunctive relief, within 90 days after the occurrence of that
alleged violation or after the grievance procedure or similar process terminates. The action
may be brought in the Superior Court for the county where the alleged violation occurred,
the county where the complainant resides or the county where the person against whom the
civil complaint is filed resides. An employee must establish each element of the employee's
case by a preponderance of the evidence.
5-A. Civil actions for injunctive relief or other remedies by utility contractors. A
utility contractor that alleges a violation of rights under this section may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief, within 90 days after the occurrence of that alleged
violation. The action may be brought in the Superior Court for the county where the alleged
violation occurred, the county where the complainant resides or the county where the
person against whom the civil complaint is filed resides. A utility contractor must establish
each element of the utility contractor's case by a preponderance of the evidence.
6. Remedies ordered by court. A court, in rendering a judgment in an action brought
pursuant to this section, may order reinstatement of the employee, the payment of back
wages, full reinstatement of fringe benefits and seniority rights or any combination of these
remedies. If an employee or utility contractor is the prevailing party, a court shall award
the employee or utility contractor all or a portion of the costs of litigation, including
reasonable attorney's fees and witness fees.
7. Agreements. This section does not diminish or impair the rights of a person under
any collective bargaining agreement. A public utility, competitive electricity provider or
affiliated interest may not enter into an agreement preventing employees from exercising
their rights to testify before or provide information to a legislative committee, the
commission or the Public Advocate pursuant to this section.
8. Jury trial; common-law rights. Any action brought under this section may be
heard by a jury. Nothing in this section derogates any common-law rights of an employee
or employer.
9. Contracts with utility contractors. If a utility contractor, in compliance with this
section and in good faith, testifies before or provides information to a legislative committee,
the commission or the Public Advocate, a public utility or competitive electricity provider
may not respond to such action by the utility contractor by:
A. Terminating or threatening to terminate a contract with the utility contractor; or
B. Harming or threatening to harm the utility contractor financially.
Page 3 - 132LR2099(01)

10. Notice of rights required Whistleblower training and assessment. A public
utility and a competitive electricity provider shall notify the public utility's and the
competitive electricity provider's employees, affiliated interests and utility contractors of
their rights under this section An employer shall provide employees a live or recorded
training and awareness assessment pertaining to the rights and responsibilities of
whistleblowers under this section. The employer shall provide the training and assessment
to all employees at least once every 2 years. The whistleblower training and assessment
must be provided by the Office of the Public Advocate or by its designee. Assessment
results must be reported in the aggregate to the commission and in the annual report of the
Office of the Public Advocate.
11. Penalties. The commission may shall impose penalties for violations of this
section. This subsection does not apply in the case of an employee of a utility contractor
alleging a violation under subsection 3.
12. Rulemaking. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
13. Anonymous reporting. The commission shall provide a secure hotline or portal
for a whistleblower reporting potentially imprudent or illegal activity. If a whistleblower
using the hotline or portal chooses to remain anonymous, the commission shall take all
reasonable steps to protect the anonymity of the whistleblower.
14. Investigation. The commission or its designee may investigate a report made
under this section. Materials related to an investigation that in the judgment of the
commission may compromise the identity of a whistleblower must be treated as
confidential and may be shared only with the Office of the Public Advocate and a
contracted investigator.
15. Limitation. An anonymous report under subsection 13 may not be relied upon as
the evidentiary basis for any penalty, rate reduction or disallowance by the commission.
16. Compensation. A whistleblower may petition the commission for and may be
awarded financial compensation totaling between 10% and 30% of the administrative
penalty or savings to ratepayers. In establishing the amount of the award, the commission
shall consider the extent to which the whistleblower report was instrumental in leading to
the administrative penalty or savings to ratepayers.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.